Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.310

Department of natural resources to report annually on university trust lands transactions.

It shall be the duty of the department of natural resources to make a report to the board of regents of Washington State University on or as soon as practicable after the close of each fiscal year, which shall contain a complete detailed statement of the current status of trust land sale contracts and income for the university from trust lands managed by the department.

[ 1988 c 128 s 6; 1977 c 75 s 24; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.310. Prior: 1899 c 9 s 1; RRS s 7849. Formerly RCW 28.80.240.]